Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 13
UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANKS

Sec.

Code Commission notes.

- Two 1988 Acts added a new Chapter 13 to this title. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072 has retained the Chapter 13 designation, but the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 354 has been redesignated as Chapter 14 and the Code sections have been renumbered accordingly.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Underground gas storage, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-12.

Underground storage tank management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-15.

12-13-1. Short title.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the "Georgia Underground Storage Tank Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-13-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on construction law for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (2003).

12-13-2. Public policy.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Georgia, in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the public health, safety, and well-being of its citizens and to protect and enhance the quality of its environments, to institute and maintain a comprehensive state-wide program for the management of regulated substances stored in underground tanks.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources shall be designated as the state agency to administer the provisions of this chapter. The director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources shall be the official charged with the primary responsibility for the enforcement of this chapter. In exercising any authority or power granted by this chapter and in fulfilling duties under this chapter, the director shall conform to and implement the policies outlined in this chapter.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to create an environmental assurance fund which, in addition to those purposes set forth in subsections (f) and (g) of Code Section

12-13-9

, may also be used by owners and operators as an alternate to insurance purchased from insurance companies for purposes of evidencing financial responsibility for taking corrective action and compensation of third parties for bodily injury and property damage caused by sudden and nonsudden accidental releases arising from operating underground storage tanks.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 12.)

12-13-3. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Corrective action" means those activities required for response to and cleanup of releases of regulated substances from underground storage tanks, including, but not limited to, initial response, initial abatement measures and site check, initial site characterization, free product removal, investigations for soil and ground-water cleanup, and preparation and implementation of a corrective action plan.

"Department" means the Department of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Federal act" means the Solid Waste Disposal Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 3152, et seq., as amended, particularly by the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984, Public Law 98-616, 42 U.S.C. Section 6991, et seq., as amended by Public Law 99-499, 1986.

"Guarantor" means any person, other than the owner or operator, who provides evidence of financial responsibility for an owner or operator.

"Nonoperational storage tank" means any underground storage tank in which regulated substances will not be deposited or from which regulated substances will not be dispensed after November 8, 1984.

"Operator" means any person in control of or having daily responsibility for the operation of the underground storage tank.

"Owner" means, in the case of an underground storage tank in use on November 8, 1984, or brought into use or capable of being used after that date, any person who owns an underground storage tank used for or capable of being used for the storage or dispensing of regulated substances and, in the case of any underground storage tank in use before November 8, 1984, but no longer in use or capable of being used on November 8, 1984, any person who owned such tank immediately before the discontinuation of its use; provided, however, that such term shall not include any person who, without participating in the management of an underground storage tank and otherwise not engaged in petroleum production, refining, and marketing, holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect that person's security interest in the underground storage tank.

"Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint-stock company, corporation, including a government corporation, partnership, association, municipality, commission, political subdivision, or any agency, board, department, or bureau of this state or of any other state or of the federal government.

"Petroleum" means petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof which is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure (60 degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute).

"Petroleum product" means petroleum, including gasoline, gasohol, diesel fuel, fuel oils including #2 fuel oil, and kerosene, including jet turbine fuel.

"Regulated substance" means any substance defined in Section 101 of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Section 9601, as amended by P.L. 99-499, 1986, et seq., and petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof which is liquid at the standard conditions of temperature and pressure of 60 degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute, but not including any substance regulated as a hazardous waste under Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 8 of this title, the "Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Act," as amended.

"Release" means any spilling, leaking, emitting, discharging, escaping, leaching, or disposing from an underground storage tank into ground water, surface water, or subsurface soils.

"Terminal" means a bulk storage facility for storing petroleum products supplied by pipeline or marine vessel.

"Third-party liability" means:

As to bodily injury, specific physical bodily injury proximately resulting from exposure, explosion, or fire caused by the presence of a release from a regulated underground storage tank and which is incurred by a person other than the owner or operator, the landlord of the owner or operator, employees or agents of an owner or operator, or employees or agents of the landlord of an owner or operator; and

As to property damage, actual physical damage or damage due to specific loss of normal use of property owned by a person other than either the owner or operator of an underground storage tank from which a release has occurred or the landlord of an owner or operator of the underground storage tank from which a release has occurred.

"Underground storage tank" means any one or combination of tanks, including underground pipes connected thereto, which is used to contain an accumulation of regulated substances and the volume of which, including the volume of the underground pipes connected thereto, is 10 percent or more beneath the surface of the ground.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 12; Ga. L. 1989, p. 256, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 12/HB 79; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 12/SB 52.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted "provided, however, that such term" for "provided, however, such term" in the middle of paragraph (10).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-4. Exceptions to chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to the following:

Any farm or residential tank of 1,100 gallons or less capacity used for storing motor fuel for noncommercial purposes;

Any tank used for storing heating oil for consumptive use on the premises where stored;

Any septic tank;

Any pipeline facility, including gathering lines:

Regulated under the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 U.S.C. Section 1671, et seq.;

Regulated under the Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979, 49 U.S.C. Section 2001, et seq.; or

Which is an intrastate pipeline facility regulated under state law comparable to the provisions of law referred to in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph;

Any surface impoundment, pit, pond, or lagoon;

Any storm-water or waste-water collection system;

Any flow-through process tank;

Any liquid trap or associated gathering lines directly related to oil or gas production and gathering operations; or

Any storage tank situated in an underground area (such as a basement, cellar, mine working, drift, shaft, or tunnel), if the storage tank is situated upon or above the surface of the floor.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "Section" was inserted following "U.S.C." in subparagraphs (4)(A) and (4)(B).

12-13-5. Rules and regulations; enforcement powers.

In the performance of its duties, the board shall have and may exercise the power to:

Adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter as the board may deem necessary to provide for the management of regulated substances stored in underground tanks to protect the environment and health of humans. Such rules and regulations may be applicable to the state as a whole or may vary from area to area, as may be appropriate to facilitate the accomplishment of the provisions, purposes, and policies of this chapter. The rules and regulations shall include all requirements necessary for consistency with applicable federal law and federal regulations and shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Standards and control measures applicable to underground storage tanks and owners or operators of underground storage tanks. These standards and control measures may include, but are not limited to:

Requirements for maintaining a leak detection system, an inventory control system together with tank testing, or a comparable system or method designed to identify releases in a manner consistent with the protection of human health and the environment;

Requirements for maintaining records of any monitoring or leak detection system or inventory controls or inventory control system or tank testing or comparable system;

Requirements for reporting of any releases and corrective actions taken in response to a release from an underground storage tank; and

Requirements for notification regarding the existence of operational or nonoperational underground storage tanks;

Requirements for maintaining evidence of financial responsibility consistent with applicable federal law and federal regulation; and

Performance standards for underground storage tanks brought into use on or after the effective date of such standards. The performance standards for new underground storage tanks shall include, but are not limited to, design, construction, installation, release detection, and compatibility standards; and

Take all necessary steps to ensure the effective enforcement of this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Underground storage tank management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-15.

12-13-6. Powers and duties of director.

The director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this chapter and all rules, regulations, and orders issued under this chapter;

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, reviews, investigations, research, and demonstrations relating to underground tank storage of regulated substances in this state as he deems advisable and necessary;

To make investigations, analyses, and inspections to determine and ensure compliance with this chapter, the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter, and any orders which the director may issue;

To enter into such contracts as may be convenient, required, or necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter, including the administration of the state underground storage tank program;

To prepare, develop, amend, modify, submit, and enforce any comprehensive plan or program sufficient to comply with this chapter and the federal act for the control, regulation, and monitoring of underground tank storage of regulated substances in this state;

To conduct such public hearings as are required by this chapter or as he deems necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and to control and manage the conduct procedure for such public hearings;

To advise, consult, cooperate, and contract on underground tank storage of regulated substance matters with other agencies of this state, political subdivisions thereof, and other designated organizations or entities; and, with the approval of the Governor, to negotiate and enter into agreements with the governments of other states and the United States and their several agencies, subdivisions, or designated organizations or entities;

To collect and disseminate information and to provide for public notification in matters relating to underground tank storage of regulated substances;

To issue, amend, modify, or revoke orders as may be necessary to ensure and enforce compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter;

To institute, in the name of the division, proceedings of mandamus, injunction, or other proper administrative and civil proceedings to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter, or any orders issued under this chapter;

To accept, receive, administer, or disperse funds obtained from bond issues of the state or authorities of the state or from general appropriations or grants from public or private sources for the purpose of proper administration of this chapter or for carrying out any of the duties, powers, or responsibilities under this chapter, to enter into such agreements as the director deems appropriate to accomplish such purpose, and to repay such funds when the terms of the grant, bond issue, or general appropriation require repayment;

To grant variances in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter, provided such variances are not inconsistent with the federal act and rules or regulations promulgated under such act;

To encourage voluntary cooperation by persons and affected groups to achieve the purposes of this chapter;

To assure that the State of Georgia complies with the federal act and retains maximum control under such act and receives all desired federal grants, aid, and other benefits;

To require any person who is an owner or operator of an underground storage tank to notify the division in writing as provided by this chapter;

To require any person who is an owner of an underground storage tank taken out of operation after January 1, 1974, to notify the division in writing as provided by this chapter;

To maintain an inventory of underground tanks within the state, including such information as location, identity, quantity, method of storage, owners and operators, and any other information which the director may deem necessary to administer and enforce this chapter;

To adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal criteria for the identification of regulated substances and the determination of whether any substance or combination of substances is regulated for the purposes of this chapter;

To establish underground storage tank technical standards for the state provided they are in all cases consistent with those provided by the federal act;

To take all necessary steps to ensure that the administration of this chapter is consistent with and equivalent to the provisions of the federal act and any standards, rules, or regulations, promulgated under such act; and

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The powers and duties provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section may be exercised and performed by the director through such duly authorized employees of the department as the director deems necessary and proper.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 658, § 1.)

12-13-7. Performance standards applicable until rules and regulations effective.

Until the effective date of rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Code Section 12-13-5, no person may install an underground storage tank for the purpose of storing regulated substances unless such tank meets the performance standards established pursuant to the federal act.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1.)

12-13-8. Investigations.

The director, an authorized employee of the department, or an authorized contractor or agent of the department, upon presentation of his or her credentials, shall have a right to enter upon, to, or through premises of persons subject to this chapter, or premises whereon a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter is reasonably believed to be occurring or is reasonably believed to be about to occur, to investigate, take samples of, and copy all records relating to the storage of regulated substances in underground tanks, and to inspect for compliance with the requirements imposed under this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or to determine whether such a violation or threatened violation exists.

In the event any person does not consent to an inspection or investigation, the director or an authorized employee of the department shall have the power to seek a warrant authorizing the inspection or investigation.

The director, an authorized employee of the department, or an authorized contractor or agent of the department, upon presentation of his or her credentials, shall have a right to enter upon, to, or through premises of persons subject to this chapter or premises whereon a release of a regulated substance in violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter is reasonably believed to be occurring or is reasonably believed to have previously occurred to investigate, take samples, copy all records relating to storage of regulated substances in underground storage tanks, and inspect for compliance with the requirements imposed under this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter in order to determine whether such a current release or past release exists and to conduct appropriate corrective action for any release which may currently exist or may have existed.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, "regulations" was substituted for "regulation" near the middle of subsection (a).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

12-13-9. Establishing financial responsibility; claims against guarantor; Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund.

The board shall promulgate regulations containing requirements for maintaining evidence of financial responsibility as deemed necessary and desirable for taking corrective action and for compensation of third parties for bodily injury and property damage caused by sudden and nonsudden accidental releases arising from operating an underground storage tank.

Financial responsibility required by this Code section may be established in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board by any one or combination of the following: insurance, guarantee, surety bond, letter of credit, qualification as a self-insurer, or any other method satisfactory to the board. In promulgating requirements under this Code section, the board is authorized to specify policy or other contractual terms, conditions, or defenses which are necessary or are acceptable in establishing such evidence of financial responsibility in order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and comply with financial responsibility requirements.

Financial responsibility programs established pursuant to this chapter and administered by the division may be submitted as evidence of financial responsibility required under this chapter.

In any case where the owner or operator is in bankruptcy, reorganization, or arrangement pursuant to the federal Bankruptcy Code or where, with reasonable diligence, jurisdiction in any state court or the federal courts cannot be obtained over an owner or operator likely to be solvent at the time of judgment, any claim arising from conduct for which evidence of financial responsibility must be provided under this Code section may be asserted directly against the guarantor providing such evidence of financial responsibility. In the case of any action pursuant to this subsection, such guarantor shall be entitled to invoke all rights and defenses which would have been available to the owner or operator if any action had been brought against the owner or operator by the claimant and which would have been available to the guarantor if any action had been brought against the owner or operator by the claimant and which would have been available to the guarantor if an action had been brought against the guarantor by the owner or operator.

The total liability of any guarantor shall be limited to the aggregate amount which the guarantor has provided as evidence of financial responsibility to the owner or operator under this Code section. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit any other state or federal statutory, contractual, or common law liability of a guarantor to its owner or operator including, but not limited to, the liability of such guarantor for bad faith either in negotiating or in failing to negotiate the settlement of any claim. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to diminish the liability of any person under Sections 107 and 111 of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Section 9601, et seq., as amended by P.L. 99-499, 1986.

There is hereby established the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund. The director shall serve as trustee of this fund. The principal of the moneys deposited in such fund pursuant to Code Section 12-13-10 may be expended by the director for the following purposes:

To take whatever emergency action is necessary or appropriate to assure that the public health or safety is not threatened whenever there is a release or substantial threat of a release of regulated substances from an underground storage tank;

To take preventive or corrective actions where the release of the regulated substances presents an actual or potential threat to human health or the environment where the owner or operator has not been identified or is unable, as determined by the director, to perform corrective action, including but not limited to, provisions for providing alternative water supplies;

To provide compensation for third-party liabilities; provided, however, that any such expenditure shall be subject to the following limitations:

A property owner shall not be considered a third party if the property was transferred by the owner or operator of an underground storage tank in anticipation of damage due to a release;

Third-party liability property damage shall be reimbursed from the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund based on the rental costs of comparable property during the period of loss of use up to a maximum amount equal to the fair market value. In the case of property that is actually destroyed as a result of a petroleum release, reimbursement shall be an amount necessary to replace or repair the destroyed property, whichever is less; and

Payments for third-party liability damages, as defined in this chapter, shall never exceed the amount of the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund coverage as provided in this chapter for any owner or operator and shall not include payments for any claims for attorney's fees for third-party claimants or punitive damages or mental anguish;

To pay for any portion of the administrative cost of administering the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund which exceeds the amount of interest earned on the corpus of such fund; provided, however, that no more than 10 percent of the fees collected annually pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-13-10 shall be used for such purpose;

To provide reimbursements to eligible participating owners and operators who have conducted corrective action;

To provide payments to state contractors for eligible participating owners and operators who are unable, as determined by the director, to conduct corrective action for petroleum releases from underground storage tanks; and

To provide repayments for any grant, general appropriation, or bond issue as are authorized by general law which are advanced to the principal of the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund to accomplish any of the purposes enumerated in paragraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection when the terms of the grant, appropriation, or bond issue require such repayment.

Any interest earned upon the corpus of the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund shall not become a part thereof but shall be paid over to the division to be utilized by the division for administration of the state Underground Storage Tank Program. Any such funds not expended for this purpose in the fiscal year in which they are generated shall be deposited in the state treasury, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to allow the division to retain any funds required by the Constitution of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury; provided, further, that the division shall comply with all provisions of Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, known as the "Budget Act," except Code Section 45-12-92, prior to expending any such funds.

If any person chooses to make a claim against the fund and accepts payment from the fund, then the state shall be subrogated to any cause of action that the claimant may have to the extent of such payment or judgment. In any such action, the amount of damages shall be proved by the division by submitting to the court a written report of the amounts paid or owed from the fund to claimants. Such written report shall be admissible in evidence and the amounts paid from or owed by the fund to the claimants stated therein shall be presumed to be the amount of the damages.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund shall not be considered an insurance company or insurer under the laws of this state.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 658, § 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 12/HB 79.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in the last sentence of subsection (e), "et seq.," was substituted for "et. seq.,".

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, "require" was substituted for "requires" in paragraph (f)(7).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

-
For article on CERCLA liability for secured creditors, see 41 Emory L.J. 167 (1992).

12-13-10. Environmental assurance fees; late participation fee.

In order to participate in the liability limitations and reimbursement benefits of the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund, a potential claimant shall pay to the division his or her share of an environmental assurance fee on each gallon of petroleum products imported into this state. Such fees shall be established by the board in such amount as is sufficient to assure the funding of emergency, preventive, or corrective actions necessary when public health or safety is, or potentially may be, threatened from a release of regulated substances from an underground storage tank, at a rate not to exceed 1.0› per gallon. This fee shall be collected by the terminal operator upon request of the owner or operator when the petroleum is removed from a terminal by the person who sells the petroleum, or if the petroleum product will never be stored in a terminal in this state then by the importer thereof, and paid to the department. Proof of such payment shall be provided the owner or operator. Exchanges of petroleum products on a gallon-for-gallon basis within a terminal shall be exempt from this fee. Petroleum product which is subsequently exported from this state is exempt from this fee.

Environmental assurance fees as specified in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be paid into the trust fund until the unobligated principal balance of the environmental assurance fees contained in the trust fund equals or exceeds $50 million, regardless of the total balance of the trust fund, at which time no environmental assurance fees shall be levied unless the unobligated balance of environmental assurance fees in the trust fund is less than or equal to $30 million, in which case the collection of the environmental assurance fee will resume within 180 days following the end of the month in which such unobligated balance of environmental assurance fees occurs. No funds paid into the trust fund from any source other than the environmental assurance fees shall be considered in calculating either the $50 million or $30 million balance of environmental assurance fees in the trust fund as provided in this subsection.

If an underground storage tank was in use for the storage of jet turbine fuel prior to the owner's or operator's participation in the Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund, the director shall require, as a condition for beginning participation in the fund, the owner or operator to pay into the fund a late participation fee which shall be an amount equal to the environmental assurance fee provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section which would have been paid by the owner or operator, as if the owner or operator had been a participant in the fund, during a period beginning on July 1, 1988, and ending on the beginning date of participation in the fund or beginning on the date the jet turbine fuel underground storage tank was first used, if after July 1, 1988, and ending on the beginning date of participation in the fund.

(Code 1981, §

12-13-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 256, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1421, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 804, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 658, § 3.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, capitalization changes were made throughout subsection (a).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1994, p. 804,

§

14, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.